hu: Jojó tengelyrendszer típusa: Csapágyas tengely; Fix tengely; Transaxle; Egyéb
nb: Type jojo-akselsystem: Kulelageraksel; Fast aksel; Transaksel; Annet
cs: Typ osového systému jo-jo: Osa s ložiskem; Pevná osa; Transaxle; Jiné
de: Typ des Jojo-Achsensystems: Kugellagerachse; Feste Achse; Transaxle; Sonstige
ru: Тип оси йо-йо: Ось с подшипником; Фиксированная ось; Трансаксель; Другое
ro-RO: Tipul sistemului de ax pentru yo-yo: Ax cu rulment; Ax fix; Transax; Altele
th: ประเภทของระบบแกนโยโย่: แกนหมุนตลับลูกปืน; แกนหมุนตายตัว; เพลาทรานสแอกเซิล; อื่นๆ
da: Akselsystemtype for yo-yo: Kuglelejeaksel; Fast aksel; Transaksel; Andet
tr: Yo-yo aks sistemi tipi: Rulmanlı aks; Sabit aks; Transaks; Diğer
es: Sistema de eje del yo-yo: Eje de rodamiento; Eje fijo; Transeje; Otro
pt-PT: Tipo de sistema de eixo do ioiô: Eixo de rolamento; Eixo fixo; Eixo de transmissão; Outro
sk-SK: Typ systému nápravy jojo: Ložisková oska; Pevná oska; Transaxle; Iné
lt-LT: Jo-jo ašies sistemos tipas: Ašis su guoliu; Fiksuota ašis; Tarpinė ašis; Kita
vi: Hệ thống trục Yo-yo: Trục vòng bi; Trục cố định; Trục trung gian; Khác
ja: ヨーヨーの車軸システムタイプ: ベアリングアクセル; 固定アクセル; トランスアクセル; その他
pt-BR: Ioiô tipo de sistema de eixo: Eixo de rolamento; Eixo fixo; Eixo transaxle; Outros
sl-SI: Vrsta sistema osi jo-joja: Os z ležajem; Fiksna os; Transaxle; Drugo
sv: Typ av jojoaxelsystem: Lageraxel; Fast axel; Transaxel; Övrigt
zh-CN: 悠悠球轴系统类型: 轴承轴; 固定轴; 滑轮轴; 其他
nl: Yo-yo assysteem type: As met lager; Vaste as; Transaxle; Overig
bg-BG: Тип осева система на йо-йо: Ос с лагер; Фиксирана ос; Трансаксел; Други
it: Tipo di sistema dell'asse per yo-yo: Asse con cuscinetto; Asse fisso; Asse passante; Altro
ko: 요요 축 체계 유형: 베어링 축; 고정 축; 트랜스액슬; 기타
fr: Type d’axe du yo-yo: Axe à roulement; Axe fixe; Transaxe; Autre
pl: Typ systemu osi jojo: Ośka łożyskowa; Ośka stała; Transaxle; Inne
en: Yo-yo axle system type: Bearing axle; Fixed axle; Transaxle; Other
zh-TW: 溜溜球輪軸系統類型: 軸承輪軸; 固定輪軸; 活動輪軸; 其他
el: Τύπος συστήματος άξονα γιο-γιο: Άξονας ρουλεμάν; Σταθερός άξονας; Άξονας transaxle; Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta sustava jo-jo osovina: Osovina s ležajem; Fiksna osovina; Transaxle; Ostalo
fi: Jojo-akselijärjestelmän tyyppi: Laakeriakseli; Kiinteä akseli; Väliakseli; Muu